District of Columbia statutes.
4-1405.01

Agreements with foreign agencies.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter, the Mayor is authorized to enter into agreements with any person, firm, corporation, association, or public agency licensed or authorized by a state or country for the care and placement of minors, permitting such person, firm, corporation, association, or public agency to place nonresident children in foster or adopting homes in the District of Columbia. The Mayor shall act pursuant to regulations promulgated as provided in § 4-1403 [repealed].

History

Apr. 22, 1944, ch. 174, § 5A
as added June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 247, ch. 273, § 4
Apr. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-59, § 2(a), 27 DCR 983

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1006.
1973 Ed., § 32-785a.